South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5680.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 39-20-45(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E) After the expiration of the fifty-day default period, the owner shall publish an advertisement of the public sale to the highest bidder: (1) once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation where the self-service storage facility is located.; or (2) for ten consecutive days on a publicly accessible website that regularly advertises or conducts property auctions or sales. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----